Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-142.09
Vehicle manufactured more than thirty years prior to application for certificate of title; department; duties.

If the owner does not have a certificate of title for a vehicle manufactured more than thirty years prior to application for a certificate of title which has not had any major component part replaced, the department shall search its records and any records readily accessible to the department for evidence of issuance of a certificate of title for such vehicle at the request of the owner. If no certificate of title has been issued, the owner may apply for a certificate of title indicating that the year, make, and model of the vehicle is that originally designated by the manufacturer by presenting a notarized bill of sale, an affidavit in support of the application for title, and a statement that an inspection has been conducted on the vehicle.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 10.